Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201458-826
Authority; powers over project.

The
authority may determine the location and character of any project to be financed
or refinanced under the Nebraska Educational,
Health, and Social Services Finance Authority Act and acquire, construct, reconstruct, improve, equip, remodel, renovate,
replace, maintain, repair, operate, lease as lessee or lessor, and regulate
the same. The authority may also enter into contracts for any or all of such
purposes, enter into contracts for the management and operation of a project,
and designate an eligible institution as its
agent to determine the location and character of a project undertaken by such eligible institution under the act and, as the agent of the authority,
to acquire, construct,
reconstruct, improve, equip, remodel,
renovate, replace, maintain, repair, operate, lease as lessee or lessor, and
regulate the same and, as the agent of the authority, to enter into contracts
for any or all of such purposes, including contracts for the management and
operation of such project.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 23;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 12;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2923;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 23;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1723;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 26.